Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1615.01
Public employees; abortion coverage; limitations.

No group insurance contract or health maintenance agreement providing hospitalization, medical, surgical, accident, sickness, or other health coverage paid for in whole or in part with public funds shall include coverage for abortion, as defined in section 28-326. This section shall not apply to coverage for an abortion which is verified in writing by the attending physician as necessary to prevent the death of the woman or to coverage for medical complications arising from an abortion. This section shall not prohibit the insurer from offering individual employees special coverage for abortion if the costs for such coverage are borne solely by the employee.

Laws 1981, LB 125, § 1.